Hawaii, session 2026, SB1654.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that the mission of the department of Hawaiian home lands is to develop and deliver land to native Hawaiians.  The land trust, created by Congress through the Hawaiian Homes Commission Act of 1920, as amended (HHCA), set aside lands to be used for the benefit of native Hawaiians. As required by the Hawaii Admission Act of 1959 and as a compact with the United States, the State of Hawaii and the people of Hawaii adopted the HHCA as a provision of the Hawaii State Constitution and agreed to faithfully carry out the spirit of the HHCA for the rehabilitation of the Hawaiian race.  These trust responsibilities remain to this day.  The legislature also finds that today, the department of Hawaiian home lands is responsible for the management of 203,981 acres of trust lands, 10,045 homestead leases statewide, and 47,086 lease applications.  However, over 29,451 applicants remain on the waitlist for residential, agricultural, or pastoral leases. The legislature further finds that of the department's land holdings, approximately five per cent are designated for residential use, while over sixty-three per cent are designated for general agriculture, special district, or conservation.  Given the limited land holdings, the legislature finds that the department must identify more lands appropriate for homestead development. Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to authorize the transfer of certain lands under the jurisdiction of certain state agencies to the department of Hawaiian home lands. SECTION 2. Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, the fee simple interest of certain lands under the jurisdiction of certain state agencies with the existing improvements thereon shall be conveyed to the department of Hawaiian home lands as grantee. SECTION 3. This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________